Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-334
Injurisdiction distance, defined.

Injurisdiction distance means total miles or kilometers operated (1) in the State of Nebraska during the preceding year by the motor vehicle or vehicles registered and licensed for fleet operation and (2) in noncontracting reciprocity jurisdictions by fleet vehicles that are base-plated in Nebraska.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 34.